public/third-party/apertium-translations/apertium-spa.spa.metadix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 3
	Entries: 46174
	Sdefs: 67
	Paradigms: 442
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools sort -alignMonodix -stripEmptyLines apertium-spa.spa.dix mono-sorted.dix

-->
<dictionary>

  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzŀl</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr" c="Acronym"/> 
    <sdef n="predet" c="Pre-determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="apos" c="Apostrophe"/> 
    <sdef n="detnt" c="Neuter Determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="loc" c="Locative"/> 
    <sdef n="top" c="Toponym"/> 
    <sdef n="ant" c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog" c="Cognomen"/>  
    <sdef n="al" c="Altres"/> 
    <sdef n="enc" c="Enclitic"/> 
    <sdef n="pro" c="Proclitic" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" c="Tonic"/> 
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun"/> 
    <sdef n="np" c="Proper Noun"/> 
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective"/> 
    <sdef n="f" c="Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="m" c="Masculine"/> 
    <sdef n="mf" c="Masculine / Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="sg" c="Singular"/> 
    <sdef n="pl" c="Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="preadv" 	c="Pre-adverb" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" c="Preposition"/> 
    <sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun"/> 
    <sdef n="rel" c="Relative"/> 
    <sdef n="nn" c="Inanimate"/> 
    <sdef n="an" c="Animate or Inanimate"/> 
    <sdef n="aa" c="Animate"/> 
    <sdef n="ind" c="Indefinite"/> 
    <sdef n="itg" c="Interrogative"/> 
    <sdef n="det" c="determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="dem" c="Demonstrative"/> 
    <sdef n="def" c="Definite"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating Conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Sub-ordinating Conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Conjunctive Adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="nt" c="Neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser" c="Conjugations of 'to be' or 'ser'"/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="Conjugations of 'to have' or 'haber'"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" c="Lexical Verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" c="Modal Verb"/> 
    <sdef n="inf" c="Infinitive"/> 
    <sdef n="ger" c="Gerund"/> 
    <sdef n="pp" c="Past Participle"/> 
    <sdef n="pri" c="Present indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="p1" c="First Person"/> 
    <sdef n="p2" c="Second Person"/> 
    <sdef n="p3" c="Third Person"/> 
    <sdef n="pii" c="Imperfect"/> 
    <sdef n="ifi" c="Past definite"/> 
    <sdef n="fti" c="Future indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="cni" c="Conditional"/> 
    <sdef n="prs" c="Present Subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="pis" c="Imperfect Subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="fts" c="Future Subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="imp" c="	Imperative"/> 
    <sdef n="pos" c="Possessive"/> 
    <sdef n="sp" c="Singular or Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="ref" c="Reflexive"/> 
    <sdef n="sup" c="Superlative"/> 
    <sdef n="num" c="Numeral"/> 
    <sdef n="ij" c="Interjection"/> 
    <sdef n="ord" c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="sent" c="Sentence-ending Punctuation"/> 
    <sdef n="cm" c="Comma Punctuation"/> 
    <sdef n="lpar" c="Left Parenthesis" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" c="Right Parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="lquest" c="Left question/exclamation mark"/> 
    <sdef n="web" c="Links and Emails"/> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

<!-- ************************ PREFIXES ************************ -->

<pardef n="prefixes_adj">
  <e><p><l>auto</l><r>_prefix_auto_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>hiper</l><r>_prefix_hiper_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>super</l><r>_prefix_super_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>micro</l><r>_prefix_micro_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>macro</l><r>_prefix_macro_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>anti</l><r>_prefix_anti_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>multi</l><r>_prefix_multi_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>pluri</l><r>_prefix_pluri_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>pro</l><r>_prefix_pro_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>post</l><r>_prefix_post_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>pre</l><r>_prefix_pre_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>inter</l><r>_prefix_inter_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>intra</l><r>_prefix_intra_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>pseudo</l><r>_prefix_pseudo_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>pos</l><r>_prefix_post_</r></p></e>
  <e><i/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="prefixes_adj_r">
  <e><p><l>autor</l><r>_prefix_auto_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>micror</l><r>_prefix_micro_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>macror</l><r>_prefix_macro_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>antir</l><r>_prefix_anti_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>multir</l><r>_prefix_multi_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>plurir</l><r>_prefix_pluri_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>pror</l><r>_prefix_pro_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>post</l><r>_prefix_post_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>prer</l><r>_prefix_pre_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>inter</l><r>_prefix_inter_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>intrar</l><r>_prefix_intra_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>pseudor</l><r>_prefix_pseudo_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>auto</l><r>_prefix_auto_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>micro</l><r>_prefix_micro_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>macro</l><r>_prefix_macro_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>anti</l><r>_prefix_anti_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>multi</l><r>_prefix_multi_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>pro</l><r>_prefix_pro_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>pre</l><r>_prefix_pre_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>pos</l><r>_prefix_post_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>intra</l><r>_prefix_intra_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>pseudo</l><r>_prefix_pseudo_</r></p></e>
  <e><i/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="prefixes_n">
  <e><p><l>micro</l><r>_prefix_micro_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>macro</l><r>_prefix_macro_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>auto</l><r>_prefix_auto_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>anti</l><r>_prefix_anti_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>multi</l><r>_prefix_multi_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>pro</l><r>_prefix_pro_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>post</l><r>_prefix_post_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>pre</l><r>_prefix_pre_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>re</l><r>_prefix_re_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>semi</l><r>_prefix_semi_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>pseudo</l><r>_prefix_pseudo_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>pos</l><r>_prefix_post_</r></p></e>
  <e><i/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="prefixes_n_r">
  <e><p><l>micror</l><r>_prefix_micro_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>macror</l><r>_prefix_macro_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>autor</l><r>_prefix_auto_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>antir</l><r>_prefix_anti_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>multir</l><r>_prefix_multi_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>pror</l><r>_prefix_pro_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>post</l><r>_prefix_post_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>prer</l><r>_prefix_pre_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>rer</l><r>_prefix_re_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>semir</l><r>_prefix_semi_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>pseudor</l><r>_prefix_pseudo_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>micro</l><r>_prefix_micro_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>macro</l><r>_prefix_macro_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>auto</l><r>_prefix_auto_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>anti</l><r>_prefix_anti_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>multi</l><r>_prefix_multi_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>pro</l><r>_prefix_pro_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>pre</l><r>_prefix_pre_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>re</l><r>_prefix_re_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>semi</l><r>_prefix_semi_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>pos</l><r>_prefix_post_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>pseudo</l><r>_prefix_pseudo_</r></p></e>
  <e><i/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="prefixes_vblex">
  <e><p><l>re</l><r>_prefix_re_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>auto</l><r>_prefix_auto_</r></p></e>
  <e><i/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="prefixes_vblex_r">
  <e><p><l>rer</l><r>_prefix_re_</r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>autor</l><r>_prefix_auto_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>re</l><r>_prefix_re_</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>auto</l><r>_prefix_auto_</r></p></e>
  <e><i/></e>
</pardef>

<!-- ************************ DIVERSOS ************************ -->

<pardef n="hd-hour">
    <e><re>[0-9]</re></e>
    <e><re>[01][0-9]</re></e>
    <e><re>2[0-3]</re></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hd-separator">
    <e><i>:</i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hd-minute">
    <e><re>[012345][0-9]</re></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hour-digital">
    <e><par n="hd-hour"/><par n="hd-separator"/><par n="hd-minute"/><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e>                      <par n="hour-digital"/></e>
